Utah statutes.
32A-12-502 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful removal from conveyance or
diversion of shipments.
(1)  It is unlawful for any motor carrier or other person transporting any
alcoholic product in interstate or other commerce intended for, or consigned
to, or claimed to be intended for or consigned to any person without this
state, to remove or to permit any person to remove the alcoholic product or
any part of the alcoholic product from the conveyance in which it is carried
while within this state.
(2)  Removal from the conveyance may be allowed if a motor carrier or other
person notifies the department in writing at least 24 hours before the
intended removal and complies with the instructions given by the department.
The department shall,  upon receiving this notice or a notice under Subsection
(4), take precautions as necessary to ensure compliance with the laws of this
state relating to alcoholic products.
(3)  It is unlawful for any person to receive for storage or other purpose, or
to possess any alcoholic product that has been removed from a car or other
conveyance in violation of this section.
(4)  It is unlawful for any motor carrier, or any other person, to divert to
any place within this state, or to deliver to any person in this state, any
alcoholic product that has been consigned for shipment to any place without
this state, unless the carrier or other person first notifies the department
in writing at least 24 hours before the intended diversion or delivery, and
complies with the instructions given by the department.
